Foma_files/nouns.foma
# def Animals  [ {dog} 		| {cat} 		| {horse} 	| {mouse} 	| {lion} 	| {bus} | {buzz} ];
# def Suffixes [ "[pl]": {+s}]| ["[sg]":0    	];




def Sibilant [ {ch} 		| {sh} 			| {z} 		| {s} 		| {x} 		];
def Prefixes [ {anti} 		]*;

def SibRule 	"+" -> e 	|| 	Sibilant_Sibilant 					;
def IERule 		y -> {ie} 	|| 	_"+" s 								;
def Cleanup 	"+" -> 0 											;
def Base 		Animals 		Suffixes 							;
def Grammar 	Base 	.o. 	SibRule 	.o. IERule	.o. Cleanup ;

# regex Grammar ;
